Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 6 State Police Retirement
24-6-216. Benefits — Survivor's pension upon death of retirant.

In the event a retirant dies and leaves a spouse to whom the retirant was married, the surviving spouse shall receive a pension equal to seventy-five percent (75%) of the retirant's pension, but only if the spouse has under care the retirant's dependent children whose dates of birth are prior to the retirant's date of retirement.

When the spouse no longer has under care such a dependent child, the pension shall be reduced to fifty percent (50%) of the retirant's pension.

Upon the spouse's remarriage or death, the pension provided for in this subsection shall terminate.

In the event a retirant dies and leaves a spouse to whom he or she was married and who does not have under care the retirant's dependent children, the surviving spouse shall receive a pension equal to fifty percent (50%) of the retirant's pension.

Upon the spouse's remarriage or death, the pension provided for in this subsection shall terminate.

In the event a retirant dies and does not leave a spouse eligible for a pension as provided for in this section, or in the event the surviving spouse dies or remarries and the pension provided for in subsection (a) of this section is terminated, and there is surviving the retirant a dependent child, or children, each such child shall receive a pension of an equal share of seventy-five percent (75%) of the retirant's pension.

In no case shall the pension payable to any such child exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the retirant's pension.

A child shall be a dependent child until his or her death, his or her marriage, or his or her attainment of age eighteen (18), whichever occurs first.

However, the age-eighteen maximum shall be extended as long as the child is continuously enrolled as a full-time student at an accredited secondary school or accredited postsecondary institution of higher education, but in no event beyond his or her attainment of age twenty-three (23).

The eighteen-year maximum shall also be extended for any child who has been deemed physically or mentally incompetent by a court with jurisdiction over the individual or by the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System, for as long as the incompetency exists.

Once a child ceases to be dependent, his or her annuity shall terminate and there shall be a redetermination of the amount payable to any remaining dependent children.

The board is authorized to establish through rules a means of verification of enrollment in a secondary school or postsecondary institution of higher education by a surviving dependent child under this section for purposes of pension benefits.

If a surviving spouse who is receiving survivor's benefits under this section remarries, and the benefits are discontinued, and the surviving spouse again becomes unmarried, benefits provided in this section for the spouse shall be resumed.

Benefits shall be resumed for any surviving spouse who had remarried but is unmarried on that date, but no such benefits will be paid the surviving spouse for any period prior to July 1, 1991.

Before the date his or her first annuity payment becomes due, but not thereafter, a noncontributory Tier I member may elect to:

Receive his or her annuity as a straight life annuity; or

Have his or her annuity reduced and nominate a beneficiary in accordance with the option provisions of § 24-6-408.

However, in the instance of Option B75 under § 24-6-408(a)(4), the reduced annuity shall be seventy-eight percent (78%) if the retirant's age and his or her beneficiary's age are the same on the first payment due date. The reduced annuity of seventy-eight percent (78%) shall be:

Decreased by three-quarters of one percent (0.75%) for each year the beneficiary's age is less than the retirant's age; or

Increased by three-quarters of one percent (0.75%), up to a maximum of ninety percent (90%), for each year that the beneficiary's age is more than the retirant's age.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 311, § 5; 1953, No. 309, § 1; 1957, No. 308, § 1; 1959, No. 484, § 5; 1977, No. 403, § 1; 1981, No. 909, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-455; Acts 1989, No. 529, § 1; 1991, No. 387, § 1; 1995, No. 731, § 1; 2001, No. 151, § 61; 2009, No. 742, § 3; 2019, No. 315, § 2874.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted, the 1991 amendment in (e)(2) began “Effective July 1, 1991.”

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment redesignated (f), added (f)(2)(B), and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (d)(3).

24-6-217. Benefits — Survivor's pension upon death of member.

In the case of a member who dies on or after January 1, 1956, and leaves a spouse who has the care of the member's dependent child or children, the surviving spouse shall receive a pension equal to the greater of one thousand eight hundred dollars ($1,800) per annum or seventy-five percent (75%) of the pension to which the member would have been entitled had he or she retired the day preceding the date of his or her death, notwithstanding that the member might not have been eligible to retire.

When the surviving spouse no longer has the care of the dependent child, the pension shall be reduced to the greater of one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200) per annum or fifty percent (50%) of the pension to which the member would have been entitled had he or she retired the day preceding the date of his or her death, notwithstanding that the member might not have been eligible to retire.

Upon the surviving spouse's remarriage or death, the pension provided for in this subsection shall terminate.

In the case of a member who dies on or after January 1, 1956, and leaves a spouse who does not have in his or her care the member's dependent child or children, the surviving spouse shall receive a pension equal to the greater of one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200) per annum or fifty percent (50%) of the pension to which the member would have been entitled had he or she retired the day preceding the date of his or her death, notwithstanding that the member might not have been eligible to retire.

Upon the surviving spouse's remarriage or death, the pension provided for in this subsection shall terminate.

In the event a member dies and does not leave a spouse, or in the event the surviving spouse remarries or dies and there is surviving the member a dependent child or children, each such child shall receive a pension of an equal share of the greater of one thousand eight hundred dollars ($1,800) per annum or seventy-five percent (75%) of the pension to which the member would have been entitled had he or she retired the day preceding the date of his or her death, notwithstanding that he or she might not have been eligible to retire.

In no case shall the annual pension payable to any such child exceed fifteen percent (15%) of the final average annual salary of the deceased member.

In the event a member who has five (5) or more years of credited service dies and leaves neither a spouse nor children eligible for pensions provided for in subsections (a)-(c) of this section, and there is surviving the member his or her parents, whom the board finds to be dependent upon the member for at least fifty percent (50%) of their support due to lack of financial means, each dependent parent shall receive a pension of an equal share of fifty percent (50%) of the pension to which the member would have been entitled had he or she retired the day preceding the date of his or her death, notwithstanding that the member might not have been eligible to retire.

Upon the remarriage or death of the parent, his or her pension shall terminate.

A child shall be a dependent child until his or her death, his or her marriage, or his or her attainment of age eighteen (18), whichever occurs first.

However, the age-eighteen maximum shall be extended as long as the child is continuously enrolled as a full-time student at an accredited secondary school or accredited postsecondary institution of higher education, but in no event beyond his or her attainment of age twenty-three (23).

The eighteen-year maximum shall also be extended for any child who has been deemed physically or mentally incompetent by a court with jurisdiction over the individual or by the board, for as long as the incompetency exists.

Once a child ceases to be dependent, his or her annuity shall terminate and there shall be a redetermination of the amount payable to any remaining dependent children.

The board is authorized to establish through rules a means of verification of enrollment in a secondary school or postsecondary institution of higher education by a surviving dependent child under this section for purposes of pension benefits.

If a surviving spouse who is receiving survivor's benefits under this section remarries, and the benefits are discontinued, and the surviving spouse again becomes unmarried, benefits provided in this section for the spouse shall be resumed.

Benefits shall be resumed for any surviving spouse who had remarried but is unmarried on that date, but no such benefits will be paid the surviving spouse for any period prior to July 1, 1991.

If the member is killed while in the official line of duty and the surviving spouse is eligible for a deferred benefit under this section, the surviving spouse may elect to receive a reduced benefit beginning immediately.

The reduction of the benefit otherwise defined in this section shall be:

Five-tenths of one percent (0.5%) per month for each of the first sixty (60) months that the benefit begins before it would have otherwise begun; plus

Twenty-five hundredths of one percent (0.25%) per month for each month more than sixty (60) months that the benefit begins before it would have otherwise begun.

However, the total reduction under this subsection shall not be more than fifty percent (50%).

Those who otherwise would have been eligible for this benefit on or after July 1, 2002, may also elect this reduced benefit prospectively.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 311, § 5; 1953, No. 309, § 1; 1957, No. 308, § 1; 1959, No. 484, § 5; 1971, No. 130, §§ 1, 2; 1981, No. 909, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-455; Acts 1989, No. 529, § 2; 1991, No. 387, § 2; 2003, No. 1735, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 2875.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted, the 1991 amendment in (f)(2) began “Effective July 1, 1991”.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (e)(3).

24-6-218. Benefits — Survivors' benefits upon death of officer killed in line of duty while not member of system — Definition.

In the event any uniformed employee of the Division of Arkansas State Police is killed while in the performance of his or her duties, yet the surviving spouse and surviving children of the uniformed employee of the division are deprived of receiving benefits as prescribed in § 24-6-217 because the uniformed employee was not a member of the system at the time of his or her death, or had not completed any probationary period of service required by rules of the Arkansas State Police Commission, or had not obtained sufficient service for benefits, the surviving spouse may make application to the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System.

Upon establishing proof of the facts set forth in this subsection, the surviving spouse and surviving children shall be eligible for and receive survivors' benefits for himself or herself and the unmarried children of the deceased uniformed employee who was killed in the line of duty, which children are under eighteen (18) years of age or twenty-two (22) years of age while enrolled in an institution of higher education, as provided in § 24-6-217.

Upon the reaching of eighteen (18) years of age by the unmarried children or the failure to enroll in an institution of higher education if the child is under age twenty-two (22), the surviving spouse shall continue to receive benefits as provided by law, but upon his or her remarriage or death, the benefits shall terminate.

It is the specific intent of this section that surviving spouses as described in this section be eligible for survivors' benefits for themselves and any unmarried children under eighteen (18) years of age of the deceased uniformed employee of the division who was killed in the line of duty, or any children under age twenty-two (22) while enrolled in an institution of higher education, irrespective of whether the employee was a member of, or was eligible for benefits under, the State Police Retirement System at the time of his or her death.

Upon certification of these facts by the board, the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall direct the Treasurer of State to transfer from the Division of Arkansas State Police Fund, annually, to the State Police Retirement Fund an amount equal to the funds expended from the State Police Retirement Fund for the payment of survivors' benefits as authorized in this section in order to reimburse the State Police Retirement Fund therefor.

For purposes of this section, “an institution of higher education” means any public university, college, community college, and any nonpublicly supported not-for-profit college or university.

The board is hereby authorized to establish through rules a means of verification of enrollment in an institution of higher education by a surviving child under this section for purposes of continuation of pension benefits.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 309, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-460; Acts 1989, No. 529, § 3; 2019, No. 315, §§ 2876, 2877; 2019, No. 910, §§ 3557, 3558.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a)(1); and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (e)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a)(1) and (d); substituted “division” for “department” in (a)(1); and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (d).

Cross References.

Death benefits, state police officers, § 12-8-212.

Payment to dependents of state police officer killed in line of duty, § 21-5-701 et seq.

Scholarships for children of state police officers disabled or killed in line of duty, § 6-82-501 et seq.

24-6-219. Benefits — Redetermination of benefits.

Each July 1 the State Police Retirement System shall redetermine the amount of each monthly benefit which has been payable by the system for at least twelve (12) full calendar months. The redetermined amount shall be payable for the following twelve (12) calendar months.

The redetermined amount shall be the amount of the benefit payable as of the immediately preceding July 1 increased by three percent (3%).

History.

Acts 1981, No. 483, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-467; Acts 1991, No. 432, § 3; 1997, No. 130, § 1; 1999, No. 387, § 1.

24-6-220. Benefits — Increased benefits generally.

Each person receiving retirement benefits from the State Police Retirement System on July 1, 1983, shall, beginning July 1, 1983, receive an increase in monthly benefits of five percent (5%).

Beginning on July 1, 1984, all persons who were receiving benefits under the system on July 1, 1983, shall receive an additional increase in monthly benefits of five percent (5%).

History.

Acts 1983, No. 486, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-463.1.

24-6-221. Benefits — Increased benefits for persons retiring by June 1, 1982, or by July 1, 1982.

Effective July 1, 1987, the monthly retirement benefit payable to the retirees and beneficiaries of the State Police Retirement System who retired prior to July 1, 1982, shall be increased as follows:

It is the specific intent of this subsection that those retirants or beneficiaries who retired before July 1, 1975, shall receive a maximum increase of eighteen percent (18%).

The increase in benefits provided in subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall be added to the monthly benefit after the annual post-retirement increase based on the consumer price index has been applied, and the increase provided in subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall be added to the base annuity of the member or beneficiary.

On July 1, 1985, the monthly retirement benefit payable to retirants and beneficiaries of retirants of the system who retired June 1, 1982, or before shall be increased as follows:

Those retirants and beneficiaries who retired June 1, 1982, or before, shall receive one percent (1%) of the benefit amount payable June 1, 1982, for each full year from the date of retirement through June 1, 1983, with a maximum increase payable of ten percent (10%) of the June 1, 1982, retirement benefit.

The following schedule shall be used to determine the percent of increase due:

It is the specific intent of this subsection that those retirants or beneficiaries who retired before June 1, 1973, shall receive a maximum increase of ten percent (10%).

The increase in benefits provided in subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be added to the monthly benefit after the annual postretirement increase based on the consumer price index has been applied, and the increase provided in subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be added to the base annuity of the member or beneficiary.

Date of Retirement Percent of Increase 7-1-82 and after
0% 7-1-80 through 6-30-82
6% 7-1-75 through 6-30-80 12% Before 7-1-75 18%

Click to view table.

Date of Retirement Percent of Increase 7-1-82 and after
0% 7-1-81 through 6-1-82
1% 7-1-80 through 6-1-81
2% 7-1-79 through 6-1-80
3% 7-1-78 through 6-1-79
4% 7-1-77 through 6-1-78
5% 7-1-76 through 6-1-77
6% 7-1-75 through 6-1-76
7% 7-1-74 through 6-1-75
8% 7-1-73 through 6-1-74
9% 7-1-72 through 6-1-73 10% Before 7-1-72 10%

Click to view table.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 555, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-463.2; Acts 1987, No. 718, § 1.

24-6-222. Refund of contributions.

In the event a member leaves the employ of the Division of Arkansas State Police prior to the date he or she becomes entitled to retire with a pension payable from funds of the State Police Retirement System, he or she shall be paid, upon his or her written application filed with the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System, the accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit in the members' deposit account if his or her separation from the employ of the division occurs after five (5) years from the date he or she last became a member of the system.

If his or her separation from the employ of the division occurs within a period of five (5) years from and after the date he or she last became a member of the system, he or she shall be paid, upon his or her written application filed with the board, his or her accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit in the members' deposit account less the total interest credited to his or her individual account therein.

In the event a member who has twenty (20) years or more of credited service leaves the employ of the division for any reason except his or her retirement as provided in this subchapter, or his or her death, he or she may, if he or she so chooses, remain a member for the exclusive purpose only of receiving his or her pension as provided in § 24-6-214.

The pension shall come the first day of the calendar month next following the month in which his or her application therefor is filed with the board or after the attainment of age fifty (50).

In the event a member dies and does not leave a beneficiary entitled to a pension payable from funds of the system, his or her accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit in the members' deposit account at the time of his or her death shall be paid to such person or persons as he or she shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the board.

If there is no designated person surviving the member, his or her accumulated contributions shall be paid in accordance with the laws of descent and distribution of the State of Arkansas.

The payments may be made directly to a curator, guardian, administrator, or executor authorized to receive such payments, wherever the representative may be, with or without the appointment of a representative in this state.

Refunds of a member's contributions or accumulated contributions, as the case may be, may be made in equal installments according to such rules as the board may adopt from time to time.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 311, § 7; 1953, No. 309, § 3; 1959, No. 484, § 7; 1971, No. 309, § 6; 1977, No. 460, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-457; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2878.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (d).

24-6-223. Interest in fund not transferable or subject to legal process.

No person entitled to any interest or share in any pension, any return of contributions or accumulated contributions, or any other benefit payable or to be made payable from funds of the system shall have the right to anticipate such entitlement or to sell, assign, pledge, mortgage, or otherwise dispose of or encumber such entitlement, nor shall any interest or share in any pension, any return of contributions or accumulated contributions, or any other benefit payable or to be made payable from funds of the system be liable for the debts or liabilities of the person or persons entitled thereto, or be subject to attachment, garnishment, execution, levy, sale, or judicial proceedings, or be transferable by any means, voluntarily or involuntarily, except as expressly provided for in this subchapter.

Should a member be covered by a group insurance or prepayment plan participated in by the Department of Arkansas State Police and should he or she be permitted to, and elect to, continue the coverage as a retirant, nothing contained in this section shall prevent the board, upon the member's written request, from deducting from his or her pension the payments required of him or her to continue coverage under the group insurance or prepayment plan.

The State of Arkansas shall have the right of setoff for any claim arising from embezzlement by, or fraud of, a member, retirant, or beneficiary.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 311, § 8; 1953, No. 309, § 4; 1959, No. 484, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-458.

24-6-224. Increase in benefits.

On July 1, 1991, the monthly retirement benefit payable to retirants and beneficiaries of the State Police Retirement System who retired June 1, 1991, or before, shall be increased by four percent (4%) of the benefit payable on June 1, 1991.

The increase in benefits provided in subsection (a) of this section shall be added to the monthly benefit after the annual postretirement increase based on the consumer price index has been applied, and the increase in subsection (a) of this section shall be added to the base annuity of the retirant or beneficiary.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 380, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this subchapter” in §§ 24-6-201 — 24-6-223 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

24-6-225. Applicability of benefit provisions.

The noncontributory benefit provisions of this chapter shall be applicable to each person who has never been a member of the State Police Retirement System before January 1, 1978, and who is employed before April 3, 1997, in a position covered by the system and who thereby becomes a member.

Each other person who was a member before January 1, 1978, but who was not actively employed in a position covered by the system on January 1, 1978, shall become covered by the noncontributory benefit provisions of this chapter at the time the person first becomes so employed after January 1, 1978, unless he or she elects to become covered by the provisions of the system which require member contributions. The election must be in writing and received by the governing body of the system before the later of January 1, 1986, and six (6) months after he or she first becomes so employed after January 1, 1978.

If the member so elects benefits requiring member contributions, he or she shall pay the member contributions from the date of the employment, together with regular interest, from the dates the contributions would normally have been received by the system to the dates of actual payment.

The benefits of each member's becoming covered by the noncontributory benefit provisions of this chapter shall be computed by applying the benefit provisions prescribed by this subchapter for all credited service of the person rendered before and after January 1, 1978.

Benefit amounts based upon employment before January 1, 1978, shall not be less than benefit amounts computed in accordance with the system benefit provisions at the time of retirement which require member contributions.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 62.

24-6-226. Eligibility for benefits — Voluntary retirement for Tier I noncontributory members.

Any member who has acquired five (5) years but less than thirty (30) years of actual service and has attained age sixty-five (65) may retire upon written application filed with the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System.

Any member who has acquired five (5) or more years of actual service and has attained age fifty-two (52) may retire upon written application filed with the State Police Retirement System.

Any member who acquired thirty (30) or more years of actual service may retire at any age upon written application filed with the board.

For those members with less than thirty (30) actual years of service, the age sixty-five (65) requirement shall be reduced by one (1) month for every two (2) months of public safety credit, but in no event to an age younger than fifty-two (52).

This application shall set forth at what time, not less than thirty (30) days nor more than ninety (90) days subsequent to the execution and filing thereof, the member desires to be retired.

Upon the member's retirement, he or she shall receive a pension provided for in § 24-6-216.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 62.

24-6-227. Benefits generally — Tier I noncontributory member.

Upon retirement as provided in this subchapter, a member shall receive a straight life pension equal to one and fifty-five-hundredths percent (1.55%) of his or her final average compensation multiplied by the number of years and any fraction of a year of his or her credited service.

In addition, if a member has service resulting from employment in a position covered at any time by Social Security or another federal retirement plan supported wholly or in part by employer contributions, and if that member's age at retirement is younger than:

Social Security's minimum age for an immediate retirement benefit; and

Age sixty-two (62),

The temporary annuity shall terminate at the end of the calendar month in which the earliest of the following events occurs:

The member's death;

The member's attainment of the Social Security minimum age for an immediate monthly benefit; or

The member's attainment of age sixty-two (62).

In the event a member with five (5) years or more of actual service in the State Police Retirement System ceases to be employed as a state police officer prior to reaching the required age for voluntary retirement and does not withdraw his or her accumulated employee contributions to the system, the member shall be entitled to receive a pension upon reaching what his or her voluntary retirement age would have been if he or she had continued state police employment from time of termination of employment.

Any member may elect to withdraw his or her accumulated contributions to the system at the time of terminating employment as a state police officer and to waive any pension rights the member may have earned in the system.

It is considered sound public policy that retirement pay not exceed working pay except for increases after retirement caused by inflation. Accordingly, at the time of retirement, the total of the system annuity shall not exceed the member's final average compensation.

then the member shall receive a temporary annuity equal to three hundred and twenty-two-thousandths of one percent (0.322%) of the member's final average compensation for each year of his or her credited service.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 62.

Subchapter 3
— Deferred Option Plan

Effective Dates.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 69: Feb. 8, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes technical corrections to a number of sections of Arkansas Code Title 24; that other legislation of this session of the General Assembly may also amend some of those sections; that this act should become effective immediately so that other legislation may be amended to reflect the technical corrections made by this act and to avoid conflicts. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 1969, § 3: Emergency clause failed to pass. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that due to the events of September 11, 2001, drug infiltration, and rising crime, the State of Arkansas needs to retain its experienced state police workers; and that this act is immediately necessary because on June 1, 2005, many of these experienced state police workers will retire. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on June 1, 2005.”

Acts 2007, No. 404, § 5: Mar. 22, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act affects the benefits of certain members of the State Police Retirement System and that this act should become effective immediately to allow members of the system to properly plan their retirement and to allow the system appropriate time to implement the provisions of the act. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

24-6-301. Election to participate.

In lieu of terminating employment and accepting a service retirement pension, any state police officer who is a member of Tier I of the State Police Retirement System who has not less than thirty (30) years of credited service and who is eligible to receive a service retirement pension may elect to participate in the Arkansas State Police Officers Deferred Option Plan and defer the receipt of benefits in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter, provided the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System approves the participation in the plan.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 967, § 1; 2001, No. 151, § 63.

24-6-302. Credited service.

For purposes of this subchapter, credited service shall include service credit recognized pursuant to § 24-6-201(13).

History.

Acts 1995, No. 967, § 1; 2001, No. 151, § 64.

24-6-303. Contributions.

When a member begins participation in the Arkansas State Police Officers Deferred Option Plan, the employer contributions shall continue to be paid.

State contributions for employees who elect the plan shall be credited to the State Police Retirement System.

The monthly retirement benefits that would have been payable had the member elected to cease employment and receive a service retirement shall be paid into the Arkansas State Police Officers Deferred Option Plan Account.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 967, § 1.

24-6-304. Benefits — Rate of return.

The member's monthly retirement benefit shall not change unless the Arkansas State Police Officers Deferred Option Plan receives a benefit increase.

A member who participates in the plan shall earn interest at a rate set by the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System that shall not be greater than the actuarially assumed investment rate of return for that time.

The interest shall be credited to the individual account balance of the member on an annual basis.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 967, § 1; 2005, No. 1024, § 1; 2005, No. 1969, § 2; 2007, No. 404, § 3.

24-6-305. Method of collection.

A participant in the Arkansas State Police Officers Deferred Option Plan shall receive, at the option of the participant, a lump-sum payment from the account equal to the payments to the account, or a true annuity based upon the account of the participant, or may elect any other method of payment if approved by the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 967, § 1.

24-6-306. Duration.

The duration of participation in the Arkansas State Police Officers Deferred Option Plan for active state police officers shall not exceed seven (7) years.

At the conclusion of a member's participation in the plan, the member shall terminate employment with the Department of Arkansas State Police and shall start receiving the member's accrued monthly retirement benefit from the State Police Retirement System.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 967, § 1; 2005, No. 1969, § 1.

24-6-307. Death of participant.

If the participant dies during the period of participation in the Arkansas State Police Officers Deferred Option Plan, a lump-sum payment equal to the account balance of the participant shall be paid to the participant's survivor.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 967, § 1.

Subchapter 4
— Tier Two Benefit Plan

Effective Dates.

Acts 1997, No. 1071, § 7: Apr. 3, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the current funding provisions of the State Police Retirement System are inadequate and that the benefit provisions of the system must be modified to restore the financial security of the system; that this act accomplishes those purposes; that this act should go into effect as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 387, § 12: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that historically the State Police Retirement System has recomputed retirement benefits on July 1 of each year to reflect a cost of living increase; that this act modifies the cost of living increase; and that unless this emergency clause is adopted, this act will not go into effect of July 1 of this year; and that unless this emergency clause is adopted, this act will not be effective until July 1 of the succeeding year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 69: Feb. 8, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes technical corrections to a number of sections of Arkansas Code Title 24; that other legislation of this session of the General Assembly may also amend some of those sections; that this act should become effective immediately so that other legislation may be amended to reflect the technical corrections made by this act and to avoid conflicts. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 404, § 5: Mar. 22, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act affects the benefits of certain members of the State Police Retirement System and that this act should become effective immediately to allow members of the system to properly plan their retirement and to allow the system appropriate time to implement the provisions of the act. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 511, §
2, provided: “Retroactivity. This act applies retroactively to January 1, 2017”.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

24-6-401. Creation of Tier Two Benefit Plan.

A Tier Two Benefit Plan for the State Police Retirement System is created and established in conformance with this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1071, § 1.

24-6-402. Membership.

All state police officers first hired on or after April 3, 1997, shall be covered by the benefit provision of this subchapter.

All state police officers who were hired prior to April 3, 1997, and who are active members of the State Police Retirement System on April 3, 1997, shall have twelve (12) months from April 3, 1997, to elect coverage under the benefit provisions of this subchapter, provided the person must be an active member on the date of the election.

The election shall be made as directed by the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System and shall be irrevocable.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1071, § 1.